Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Chapter 107. Trusts and Trustees

§ 2401.
Uncertain beneficiaries; Probate Division of the Superior Court may appoint agent or attorney.

When a devise, legacy, gift, or trust is made to or for the benefit of a class or classes of beneficiaries in this State whose members are not all ascertained or definitely ascertainable, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may in its discretion appoint a person or persons as agent or attorney to represent the beneficiaries, who shall act for them and their interests, without expense to the State, in any litigation, contest, or compromise in relation to the devise, legacy, gift, trust, will, contract, or instrument by which the same is given.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 16.

§ 2402.
Probate Division of the Superior Court may appoint trustees; duties.

When, under the provisions of a will probated in another state or country, or of a decree of a court of another state or country, a devise, legacy, gift, or trust belongs to or for the benefit of a class or classes of beneficiaries in this State, whose members are not all ascertained or definitely ascertainable, or is appropriated or devoted to any purpose or benefit in which the public or a class of the public in this State is interested, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may appoint one or more trustees to take charge of the payment and distribution of the devise, legacy, gift, or trust under the will or decree.

The trustee or trustees shall give bonds and render accounts annually of all transactions to the Probate Division of the Superior Court and shall be subject to the same liabilities, and the court shall have the same power as in case of other trustees appointed by the Probate Division of the Superior Court.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 114;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 16.

§ 2403.
Trustees, when appointed.

A trustee may be appointed by the Probate Division of the Superior Court upon petition of any person, class, or beneficiary coming within the provision of the will or decree, or upon petition of a corporation representing beneficiaries under the will or decree.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 115;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 16.

§ 2404.
Repealed. 2017, No. 195 (Adj. Sess.), § 16.